test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_pottaak_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - pottáák: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    pottáák+N+Sg+Nom: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Gen: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Acc: pottáák
    pottáák+N+Sg+Ill: potákkân
    pottáák+N+Sg+Loc: potákkist
    pottáák+N+Sg+Com: potákkáin
    pottáák+N+Sg+Abe: pottáákttáá
    pottáák+N+Ess: potákkin
    pottáák+N+Par: potákkid
    pottáák+N+Pl+Nom: potákkeh
    pottáák+N+Pl+Gen: potákkij
    pottáák+N+Pl+Acc: potákkijd
    pottáák+N+Pl+Ill: potákkáid
    pottáák+N+Pl+Loc: potákkijn
    pottáák+N+Pl+Com: potákkijguin
    pottáák+N+Pl+Abe: potákkijttáá

  Noun - tubbáák: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Nom: tubbáák
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Gen: tubbáák
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Acc: tubbáák
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Ill: tubákkân
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Loc: tubákkist
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Com: tubákkáin
    tubbáák+N+Sg+Abe: tubbáákttáá
    tubbáák+N+Ess: tubákkin
    tubbáák+N+Par: tubákkid
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Nom: tubákkeh
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Gen: tubákkij
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Acc: tubákkijd
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Ill: tubákkáid
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Loc: tubákkijn
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Com: tubákkijguin
    tubbáák+N+Pl+Abe: tubákkijttáá

  Noun - haamit: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    haamit+N+Sg+Nom: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Gen: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Acc: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Ill: hamittân
    haamit+N+Sg+Loc: hamittist
    haamit+N+Sg+Com: hamittáin
    haamit+N+Sg+Abe: haamittáá
    haamit+N+Ess: hamittin
    haamit+N+Par: hamittid
    haamit+N+Pl+Nom: hamitteh
    haamit+N+Pl+Gen: hamittij
    haamit+N+Pl+Acc: hamittijd
    haamit+N+Pl+Ill: hamittáid
    haamit+N+Pl+Loc: hamittijn
    haamit+N+Pl+Com: hamittijguin
    haamit+N+Pl+Abe: hamittijttáá

  Noun - ráámmát: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Nom: ráámmát
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Gen: ráámmát
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Acc: ráámmát
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Ill: ráṃáttân
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Loc: ráṃáttist
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Com: ráṃáttáin
    ráámmát+N+Sg+Abe: ráámmáttáá
    ráámmát+N+Ess: ráṃáttin
    ráámmát+N+Par: ráṃáttid
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Nom: ráṃátteh
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Gen: ráṃáttij
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Acc: ráṃáttijd
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Ill: ráṃáttáid
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Loc: ráṃáttijn
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Com: ráṃáttijguin
    ráámmát+N+Pl+Abe: ráṃáttijttáá
    
  Noun - koomeet: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    koomeet+N+Sg+Nom: koomeet
    koomeet+N+Sg+Gen: koomeet
    koomeet+N+Sg+Acc: koomeet
    koomeet+N+Sg+Ill: komettân
    koomeet+N+Sg+Loc: komettist
    koomeet+N+Sg+Com: komettáin
    koomeet+N+Sg+Abe: koomeettáá
    koomeet+N+Ess: komettin
    koomeet+N+Par: komettid
    koomeet+N+Pl+Nom: kometteh
    koomeet+N+Pl+Gen: komettij
    koomeet+N+Pl+Acc: komettijd
    koomeet+N+Pl+Ill: komettáid
    koomeet+N+Pl+Loc: komettijn
    koomeet+N+Pl+Com: komettijguin
    koomeet+N+Pl+Abe: komettijttáá
    
  Noun - hooteel: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    hooteel+N+Sg+Nom: hooteel
    hooteel+N+Sg+Gen: hooteel
    hooteel+N+Sg+Acc: hooteel
    hooteel+N+Sg+Ill: hotellân
    hooteel+N+Sg+Loc: hotellist
    hooteel+N+Sg+Com: hotelláin
    hooteel+N+Sg+Abe: hooteelttáá
    hooteel+N+Ess: hotellin
    hooteel+N+Par: hotellid
    hooteel+N+Pl+Nom: hotelleh
    hooteel+N+Pl+Gen: hotellij
    hooteel+N+Pl+Acc: hotellijd
    hooteel+N+Pl+Ill: hotelláid
    hooteel+N+Pl+Loc: hotellijn
    hooteel+N+Pl+Com: hotellijguin
    hooteel+N+Pl+Abe: hotellijttáá

  Noun - siinap: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    siinap+N+Sg+Nom: siinap
    siinap+N+Sg+Gen: siinap
    siinap+N+Sg+Acc: siinap
    siinap+N+Sg+Ill: sinappân
    siinap+N+Sg+Loc: sinappist
    siinap+N+Sg+Com: sinappáin
    siinap+N+Sg+Abe: siinapttáá
    siinap+N+Ess: sinappin
    siinap+N+Par: sinappid
    siinap+N+Pl+Nom: sinappeh
    siinap+N+Pl+Gen: sinappij
    siinap+N+Pl+Acc: sinappijd
    siinap+N+Pl+Ill: sinappáid
    siinap+N+Pl+Loc: sinappijn
    siinap+N+Pl+Com: sinappijguin
    siinap+N+Pl+Abe: sinappijttáá

  Noun - šiiveet: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Nom: šiiveet
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Gen: šiiveet
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Acc: šiiveet
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Ill: šivettân
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Loc: šivettist
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Com: šivettáin
    šiiveet+N+Sg+Abe: šiiveettáá
    šiiveet+N+Ess: šivettin
    šiiveet+N+Par: šivettid
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Nom: šivetteh
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Gen: šivettij
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Acc: šivettijd
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Ill: šivettáid
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Loc: šivettijn
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Com: šivettijguin
    šiiveet+N+Pl+Abe: šivettijttáá

  Noun - saalaat: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Nom: saalaat
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Gen: saalaat
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Acc: saalaat
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Ill: salattân
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Loc: salattist
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Com: salattáin
    saalaat+v1+N+Sg+Abe: saalaattáá
    saalaat+v1+N+Ess: salattin
    saalaat+v1+N+Par: salattid
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Nom: salatteh
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Gen: salattij
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Acc: salattijd
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Ill: salattáid
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Loc: salattijn
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Com: salattijguin
    saalaat+v1+N+Pl+Abe: salattijttáá

  Noun - áámmát: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    áámmát+N+Sg+Nom: áámmát
    áámmát+N+Sg+Gen: áámmát
    áámmát+N+Sg+Acc: áámmát
    áámmát+N+Sg+Ill: áṃáttân
    áámmát+N+Sg+Loc: áṃáttist
    áámmát+N+Sg+Com: áṃáttáin
    áámmát+N+Sg+Abe: áámmáttáá
    áámmát+N+Ess: áṃáttin
    áámmát+N+Par: áṃáttid
    áámmát+N+Pl+Nom: áṃátteh
    áámmát+N+Pl+Gen: áṃáttij
    áámmát+N+Pl+Acc: áṃáttijd
    áámmát+N+Pl+Ill: áṃáttáid
    áámmát+N+Pl+Loc: áṃáttijn
    áámmát+N+Pl+Com: áṃáttijguin
    áámmát+N+Pl+Abe: áṃáttijttáá

  Noun - miinut: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Nom: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Gen: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Acc: miinut
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Ill: minuttân
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Loc: minuttist
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Com: minuttáin
    miinut+v2+N+Sg+Abe: miinuttáá
    miinut+v2+N+Ess: minuttin
    miinut+v2+N+Par: minuttid
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Nom: minutteh
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Gen: minuttij
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Acc: minuttijd
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Ill: minuttáid
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Loc: minuttijn
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Com: minuttijguin
    miinut+v2+N+Pl+Abe: minuttijttáá
